Utah statutes.
63A-3-405.   Participation by local entities.

(1) (a)  Not later than May 15, 2010, the following participating local entities, in conformity with the rules established under Section 63A-3-404, shall provide public financial information through the Utah Public Finance Website or their own website and provide a link to their website through the Utah Public Finance Website:

(i)  school districts;

(ii)  charter schools; and

(iii)  public transit districts created under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 8, Public Transit District Act.

(b)  Participating local entities subject to this Subsection (1) shall permit information that is generated not later than the fiscal year that begins July 1, 2009 to be accessible via the website.

(2) (a)  Not later than May 15, 2011, the following participating local entities, in conformity with the rules established under Section 63A-3-404, shall be required to provide public financial information through the Utah Public Finance Website or their own website and provide a link to their website through the Utah Public Finance Website:

(i)  counties;

(ii)  municipalities;

(iii)  local districts under Title 17B, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Local Districts, that are not already required to report; and

(iv)  special service districts under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District Act.

(b)  Participating local entities subject to this Subsection (2) shall permit information that is generated not later than the fiscal year that begins July 1, 2010 to be accessible via the website.

